Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7003.01
Department; funding; powers.

The department may apply for, receive, and administer funds received from private sources to pay for definitive diagnostic procedures for women enrolled in the breast and cervical cancer program authorized under sections 71-7001.01 to 71-7013 and funded through a grant from the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

This section does not create an entitlement for enrollees in the programs. Payments may be made to the extent funds are available in the order requests are received by the department.

The funds obtained for definitive diagnostic procedures shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Breast and Cervical Cancer Cash Fund. Money credited to the fund for purposes of this section shall be used to reimburse the costs of definitive diagnostic procedures as provided in this section.

Laws 1995, LB 68, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB797, § 23.